Vermont, session 2025-2026, H579.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Some Vermont lakes and ponds have experienced persistent
cyanobacteria blooms in recent years that typically start in early summer and
last into the fall. These blooms impair recreation and may contain toxins that
can harm individuals, pets, and wildlife.
VT LEG #385779 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.579
2026 Page 2 of 6
(2) Cyanobacteria blooms are often driven by high phosphorus
concentrations, and some waterbodies, including Lake Champlain, have been
listed by the Department of Environmental Conservation as “impaired” by
phosphorus. For impaired waterbodies subject to an established Total
Maximum Daily Load (TMDL) for phosphorus, the Agency of Natural
Resources (ANR) has worked with partners to reduce nonpoint sources of
phosphorus in the watershed.
(3) Despite phosphorus reduction efforts, residual or legacy phosphorus
may persist in a waterbody and continue to contribute to cyanobacteria blooms.
(4) Applying alum to a waterbody or treating the waterbody with alum can
limit or temporarily eliminate cyanobacteria blooms as the alum binds to
phosphorus and immobilizes it in the lake sediment, thereby preventing the
phosphorus from contributing as fuel to the cyanobacteria blooms.
(5) While effective in reducing blooms and lowering water turbidity, alum
treatment can harm aquatic invertebrates, fish, plants, and other aquatic biota.
Vermont has established a State water quality standard for aluminum because
of these harmful effects.
(6) The beneficial results of alum treatment are temporary if the sources of
phosphorus, particularly nutrient runoff from farm fields, wastewater, and
developed lands, are not reduced to near zero prior to the application of the
alum.
VT LEG #385779 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.579
2026 Page 3 of 6
(7) If the discharge of phosphorus is not curbed prior to application, the
alum treatment will need to be repeated every few years, in a cycle that has not
been well studied and may continue to harm lake water quality and aquatic
biota.
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 1285 is added to read:
§ 1285. PERMITTING STANDARDS FOR APPLICATION OF ALUM;
RULEMAKING
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Alum” means a class of hydrated double sulfate salts of aluminum
that includes aluminum sulfate, sodium aluminate, potassium aluminum
sulfate, or other aluminum compounds that are deposited in water for the
purpose of the aluminum particles binding to phosphorus particles to prevent
the phosphorus from contributing to cyanobacteria blooms.
(2) “Applicant” means the entity applying for the alum treatment permit.
(3) “Cyanobacteria” means photosynthetic bacteria that are naturally
found in freshwater, including Lake Champlain and other Vermont waters.
(4) “Cyanobacteria bloom” or “harmful algal bloom” means a dense
growth of cyanobacteria in freshwater or brackish water that results in
discolored water or scums and may produce toxins that can harm individuals,
animals, or the environment.
VT LEG #385779 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.579
2026 Page 4 of 6
(b) No person shall discharge alum into a water of the State without first
obtaining a permit from the Secretary in accordance with section 1263 of this
title, the Vermont Water Quality Standards, and the Vermont Water Pollution
Control Permit Regulations. An applicant for an alum discharge permit is
limited to the municipality or municipalities in which the waterbody proposed
for treatment is located.
(c) On or before December 1, 2026, the Secretary shall adopt by rule permit
criteria for the use of alum in lakes, ponds, and other waterbodies in the State
for the treatment of cyanobacteria and to limit cyanobacteria blooms. The rule
shall require the applicant to do the following before a permit can be granted:
(1) demonstrate a direct injury from the loss of water quality and the
cyanobacteria blooms in the waterbody, such as health impacts or reduced
value of property adjacent to the waterbody;
(2) present an analysis of alternative approaches other than the use of
alum to reduce or eliminate the cyanobacteria blooms and, when appropriate,
show that alternative approaches were implemented but did not result in
measurable water quality improvements;
(3) establish a notification process to adequately inform the public prior
to and after the alum treatment;
VT LEG #385779 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.579
2026 Page 5 of 6
(4) require the reduction or elimination of phosphorus loading from
external sources to the waterbody proposed for alum treatment and that these
limits on external phosphorus loads will be maintained post-treatment;
(5) comply with the Vermont Water Quality Standards to protect
designated uses and manage the concentration levels of aluminum so as not to
exceed acute or chronic numeric criteria set for aquatic life, including meeting
the criteria set for acceptable chronic toxicity to freshwater aquatic biota, such
as native plants, macroinvertebrates, mollusks, and fish, residing in the
waterbody proposed for alum treatment;
(6) monitor impacts to aquatic biota, turbidity, and water quality,
including levels of pH, hardness, temperature, total phosphorus, sediment
phosphorus, dissolved aluminum, dissolved oxygen, and other factors as
determined by the Secretary, both pre- and post-treatment with alum, which
can be performed by a subcontracted third party if needed; and
(7) assume the costs of the treatment and the pre- and post-treatment
monitoring processes.
Sec. 3. IMPLEMENTATION
The Secretary of Natural Resources shall not issue a permit under 10 V.S.A.
§ 1285 for the application of alum to a lake or pond until the rulemaking
required under 10 V.S.A. § 1285(c) is complete.
VT LEG #385779 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.579
2026 Page 6 of 6
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385779 v.1